Hawaii statutes.
[Part XVIIA.] TOBACCO PRODUCTS

Note

Part effective January 1, 2016.

[§321-211] Definitions. As used in
this part:

"Electronic smoking device" means any
electronic product that can be used to aerosolize and deliver nicotine or other
substances to the person inhaling the device, an electronic cigarette,
electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, or electronic pipe, and any cartridge
or other component of the device or related product.

"Possession" means knowingly having
direct physical control at a given time or knowingly having the power and the
intention, at a given time, to exercise dominion or control, including the
actual use of the tobacco product.

"Tobacco product" means tobacco in
any form, including an electronic smoking device, cigarettes, cigars, snuff,
and chewing tobacco, that is prepared or intended for consumption by, or the
personal use of, humans. [L 2015, c 122, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next